Maryland, session 2026, SB0548.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
12–202.
(a) (1) (I) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection and
subsection (c) of this section, in any proceeding to establish or modify child support, whether
pendente lite or permanent, the court shall use the child support guidelines set forth in this
subtitle.
(II) BEFORE AWARDING CHILD SUPPORT, THE COURT SHALL
DETERMINE CUSTODY IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 9 OF THIS ARTICLE IF:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0548*

SENATE BILL 548
1. REQUESTED BY A PARENT IN THE CHILD SUPPORT
PROCEEDING; AND
2. THERE HAS BEEN NO PRIOR JUDICIAL
DETERMINATION OF CUSTODY.
(2) (i) There is a rebuttable presumption that the amount of child
support which would result from the application of the child support guidelines set forth in
this subtitle is the correct amount of child support to be awarded.
(ii) The presumption may be rebutted by evidence that the
application of the guidelines would be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case.
(iii) In determining whether the application of the guidelines would
be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case, the court may consider any financial
considerations:
1. specified in an existing separation or property settlement
agreement or court order, including:
A. any provisions for payment of mortgages, marital debts, or
college education expenses;
B. the terms of any use and possession order or right to
occupy the family home under an agreement; and
C. any direct payments made for the benefit of the children
required by the agreement or order;
2. that the court deems relevant to the best interests of the
child who is the subject of the child support order; or
3. that would leave the obligor with a monthly actual income
below 110% of the 2019 federal poverty level for an individual.
(IV) THERE IS A CONCLUSIVE PRESUMPTION THAT THE
APPLICATION OF THE GUIDELINES TO AN AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE PARENTS
THAT DEPARTS FROM THE GUIDELINES WOULD BE UNJUST OR INAPPROPRIATE IF
THE PARENTS MUTUALLY ASSERT THAT THE AGREEMENT IS IN THE BEST INTEREST
OF THE CHILD.
[(iv)] (V) 1. If the court determines that the application of the
guidelines would be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case, the court shall make a
written finding or specific finding on the record stating the reasons for departing from the
guidelines.

SENATE BILL 548 3
2. The court’s finding shall state:
A. the amount of child support that would have been required
under the guidelines;
B. how the order varies from the guidelines;
C. how the finding serves the best interests of the child who
is the subject of the order; and
D. in cases in which items of value are conveyed instead of a
portion of the support presumed under the guidelines, the estimated value of the items
conveyed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.